Hawaii statutes.
[§436E-14] Foreign school curricula and
standards. The board of acupuncture shall not recognize and approve an
earned doctoral degree from a foreign university or college whose curricula and
standards are not equivalent to or higher than institutions in the United
States which have been recognized and approved by the board in the study or
practice of acupuncture. [L 1985, c 214, pt of §1]

Note

Actions taken by the board prior to December 31, 1984, remain
in full force and effect. L 1985, c 214, pt of §1.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next